Georgia, session 2025_26, SB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sales and use
taxes, is amended by revising paragraph (50) of Code Section 48-8-3, relating to exemptions
from state sales and use taxes, as follows:
"(50)(A) Sales of insulin syringes and blood glucose level measuring strips dispensed
without a prescription.
(B) The sale or use of menstrual discharge collection devices, which refers to medical
devices with the primary purpose of absorbing or capturing menstrual discharge. Such
devices shall include, but shall not be limited to, tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups,
pads, and other similar tangible personal property designed for use in connection with
the human menstrual cycle;"
S. B. 297
- 1 -

LC 50 1183
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 297
- 2 -